Massachusetts, session 194th, H3455.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 40. (a) By no later than twelve months following enactment of this
legislation, each local unit of government shall adopt a land use ordinance or bylaws that:
(1) create an expedited, streamlined permitting process for electric vehicle charging
stations, including electric vehicle charging stations installed in the public right-of-way, with
binding timeline for the review and approval of permit applications not to exceed thirty days;
(2) classify all levels of electric vehicle charging stations as permitted accessory and
primary use in all zoning districts;
(3) address electric vehicle charging in parking minimum requirements, specifically that
a parking space served by an electric vehicle charging station or any parking spaces used to site
electric vehicle charging equipment must be counted as at least one standard automobile parking
space and that any van-accessible parking space shall count as at least two standard automobile
of 2

parking spaces for the purpose of complying with any applicable minimum parking
requirements;
(4) specify that review of applications to install electric vehicle charging stations,
including electric vehicle charging stations installed in the public right-of-way, shall be limited
to the building official’s review of whether the installation meets all health and safety
requirements under local, state, and federal law and shall be administratively approved through
the issuance of a building permit or similar nondiscretionary permit.
(h) The department of energy resources and Massachusetts department of transportation,
in consultation with the appropriate and affected parties, by no later than six months following
enactment of this legislation, shall develop and publish a model land use ordinance that local
governments may elect to adopt. Upon completion, the department of energy resources and
Massachusetts department of transportation must post the model ordinance to the department’s
internet website and notify local units of government of its availability.
(i) The department of energy resources and Massachusetts department of transportation
may periodically publish amendments to the model ordinance to reflect increased electric vehicle
adoption and technological advances in the State. Any update shall not require a rulemaking
process. Upon completion of any amendment, the department of energy resources and
Massachusetts department of transportation must post the updated model ordinance to the
department’s internet website and notify local units of government of the amendments.
of 2